District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.32

Establishment of net payment received.

The Mayor shall deduct from the gross amount of any accrued statutory benefit, lump-sum payment, or settlement from any source received by a recipient of GPA (provided such money is still available to the recipient when the Mayor learns of its receipt):

(1)

Attorneys’ fees, medical expense, and other legitimate expenses of collection or settlement; and

(2)

Legitimate debts of the recipient incurred for living expenses prior to his or her application for assistance and for which credit was extended in anticipation of the award or settlement.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 532, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-205.32.